Utah statutes.
49-17-404.   Temporary retirement window for 20 years of service.

(1)  If a member qualified to retire under Section 49-17-401 or a member of this system of any age with at least 20 years of service credit or a member of this system with at least six years of service credit and has attained an age of 65 years or older retires on or after July 1, 1992, and on or before December 31, 1992, the retirement allowance shall be the same as calculated in Section 49-17-402, except that the final average monthly salary shall be calculated upon the member's final year of service.

(2) (a)  Nominations for appointments resulting from this section shall be presented to the governor not later than October 15, 1992.

(b)  To qualify, the member shall give notice of intent to retire under this section to the Administrative Office of the Courts no later than February 28, 1992.

(c)  Notice of intent to retire under this section may not be revoked.

(d)  The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide the member's application to retire to the office as required by Section 49-17-401.

